Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-544
Immunity.

Any person
who receives or releases immunization information in the form and manner prescribed
in sections 71-539 to 71-544 and any rules and regulations which may be adopted
and promulgated pursuant to sections 71-539 to 71-544 is not civilly or criminally
liable for such receipt or release.

Laws 1998, LB 1063, § 16;

Laws 2011, LB591, § 12.